Wyoming statutes. Title 1 Code of Civil Procedure
Chapter 27 Habeas Corpus

Cross references. —

As to writ generally, see art. 1, § 17, Wyo. Const.

As to original jurisdiction of supreme court, see art. 5, § 3, Wyo. Const.

As to power of district court and judges, see art. 5, § 10, Wyo. Const.

As to right of accused to apply for writ under Uniform Extradition Act, see §

7-3-210

.

For supplemental post conviction procedures, see §§

7-14-101

to

7-14-108

.

As to application for writ, see Rule 3, Sup. Ct.

Consolidated petition for post-conviction relief and habeas corpus,

filed in the district court of the county of trial and dismissed by the trial judge, was treated by the supreme court as a petition for post-conviction relief for the following reasons: (1) the court's judgment could not be impeached by a writ of habeas corpus; (2) the court in habeas corpus was not authorized to grant a new trial; (3) all issues which could have been raised in a habeas proceeding were raised in the petition for post-conviction relief; and (4) no appeal lay from the denial of the habeas petition. State ex rel. Hopkinson v. District Court, 696 P.2d 54,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 455

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 474 U.S. 865, 106 S. Ct. 187, 88 L. Ed. 2d 155, 1985 U.S. LEXIS 4988 (U.S. 1985).

Applied

in

Hamill v. Ferguson, 937 F. Supp. 1517, 1996 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 17115 (D. Wyo. 1996).

Cited

in

Hamill v. Ferguson, 937 F. Supp. 1528, 1996 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 17100 (D. Wyo. 1996).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

39 Am. Jur. 2d Habeas Corpus § 1 et seq.

Waiver or loss of accused's right to speedy trial as affecting right to habeas corpus, 57 ALR2d 239.

Right of prisoner held under extradition warrant to raise question of identity in habeas corpus proceeding, 93 ALR2d 912.

Attack, by petition for writ of habeas corpus, on personal service as having been obtained by fraud or trickery, 98 ALR2d 551.

Abuse of writ as basis for dismissal of state prisoner's second or successive petition for federal habeas corpus, 60 ALR Fed 481.

What constitutes “an opportunity for full and fair litigation” in state court precluding habeas corpus review under 28 USC § 2254 in federal court of state prisoner's fourth amendment claims, 75 ALR Fed 9.

39 C.J.S. Habeas Corpus § 1 et seq.

§ 1-27-101.
Petition to be under oath; contents.

The petition for the writ of habeas corpus shall be sworn to and shall state:

The person for whom the writ is sought is restrained of his liberty, by whom he is restrained and the place where he is restrained, stating the names of the parties if known and if unknown, describing them with as much particularity as practicable;

The cause or reason for the restraint according to the best information of the petitioner, and if it is by virtue of any legal process, a copy thereof must be annexed or a satisfactory reason presented for its absence;

The restraint is illegal;

The legality of the restraint has not been adjudged in a prior proceeding, of the same character, to the best knowledge and belief of the applicant, or if previously adjudged the facts of the prior proceeding with a copy of all the papers connected therewith or a satisfactory reason for the absence thereof; and

Whether petition for the writ has been made to and refused by any court or judge, and if a petition has been made, a copy of the petition with the reason for the refusal appended or satisfactory reasons given for the failure to do so.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 61, § 1; R.S. 1887, § 1264; R.S. 1899, § 5464; C.S. 1910, § 6326; C.S. 1920, § 7622; R.S. 1931, § 51-101; C.S. 1945, § 3-6501; W.S. 1957, § 1-810; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-28-101

.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Statutory regulation. —

The issuance of the writ of habeas corpus may be regulated by statute, provided the statutory regulations do not infringe upon the constitutional right to the writ. Miskimins v. Shaver, 8 Wyo. 392, 58 P. 411,

1899 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1899).

Availability. —

Except where there has been a remand following an appeal in a criminal case, or where one of the statutes or rules, Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

1-27-101

et seq., Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

7-14-101

through

7-14-108

, Wyo. R. Crim. P. 35, otherwise expressly permits a district court to continue to assert jurisdiction over that criminal case, no authority exists for the district court to act in the case and its jurisdiction over the case should end. Barela v. State, 2002 WY 143, 55 P.3d 11,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Wyo. 2002).

The district court was without jurisdiction to consider defendant's motion to withdraw a guilty plea filed over five years after the entry of his plea and over five years after his sentence was imposed; defendant's criminal case became final for purposes of the motion to withdraw his guilty plea at the expiration of the time for taking a direct appeal from the district court's judgment and sentence. Barela v. State, 2002 WY 143, 55 P.3d 11,

2002 Wyo. LEXIS 168

(Wyo. 2002).

Requirements of petition. —

Petition for writ is required to state that the person on whose behalf it is presented, is illegally restrained of his liberty, or the writ may be granted without an application whenever the court or judge has evidence, from some proceedings before them, that any person within jurisdiction of the court or officer is illegally imprisoned or restrained of his liberty. State v. Keefe, 17 Wyo. 227, 98 P. 122,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Wyo. 1908).

Noncompliance held not fatal. —

While the petitioner did not file in the supreme court a copy of all the papers connected with a former proceeding, and such failure to comply with this section was specifically disapproved and might have constituted grounds for refusing the writ, since the supreme court had allowed the writ earlier, the omission was not fatal. In re Briggs, 404 P.2d 752,

1965 Wyo. LEXIS 147

(Wyo. 1965).

Repeated applications. —

Subdivision 4 does not prevent repeated applications for the writ, when, upon showing of the prisoner, he is entitled to relief. Miskimins v. Shaver, 8 Wyo. 392, 58 P. 411,

1899 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1899).

Jurisdictional facts. —

Jurisdictional facts cognizable on habeas corpus are not alone those which relate to jurisdiction of the subject matter and of the person, but also those relating to jurisdiction to render the particular judgment. Hovey v. Sheffner, 16 Wyo. 254, 93 P. 305,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1908).

Jurisdictional matters. —

Province of habeas corpus proceedings is to inquire only into jurisdiction matters. Ex parte Madson, 25 Wyo. 338, 169 P. 336,

1917 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo. 1917).

One of the provisos of habeas corpus proceedings is to inquire into jurisdictional matters. State ex rel. Klopotek v. District Court, 621 P.2d 223,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo. 1980).

Impeaching regularity of judgment. —

In habeas corpus proceedings regularity of the judgment under which petitioners were imprisoned cannot be impeached for errors or defects not affecting the jurisdiction of the court to render the judgment. Hollibaugh v. Hehn, 13 Wyo. 269, 79 P. 1044,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1905).

Collateral attack on judgment. —

Where attack on judgment by habeas corpus is collateral, judgment cannot be impeached for any error or irregularity not affecting power of the court to act in the case. Younger v. Hehn, 12 Wyo. 289, 75 P. 443,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1904).

Attack of decisions. —

Unless a court has exceeded its jurisdiction, its decisions are not subject to attack by means of a writ of habeas corpus, no matter how erroneous they may appear to be. Miskimins v. Shaver, 8 Wyo. 392, 58 P. 411,

1899 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1899).

Nature of inquiry. —

Inquiry will not be made, on habeas corpus whether a de facto state penitentiary, wherein petitioner is imprisoned, is such de jure. Kingen v. Kelley, 3 Wyo. 566, 28 P. 36,

1891 Wyo. LEXIS 15

(Wyo. 1891).

Discharged insane patients. —

Where a patient, not violently or dangerously insane, was unconditionally discharged by competent authority of the hospital, he cannot be reincarcerated without another judicial inquiry. Byers v. Solier, 16 Wyo. 232, 93 P. 59,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1907).

Discharge when arrested on civil warrant. —

A party arrested on a civil warrant in another county from that in which action is pending is entitled to discharge on habeas corpus. Ahlrep v. Hughes, 18 Wyo. 51, 102 P. 659,

1909 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1909).

Arrest without warrant. —

An arrest without a warrant is not a jurisdictional defect, and is waived where the persons arrested appear in court and submit to arraignment without objection. Hollibaugh v. Hehn, 13 Wyo. 269, 79 P. 1044,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1905).

Extradition. —

Habeas corpus is a proper proceeding to determine whether accused is a fugitive from justice, and subject to return to another state in extradition proceedings. Ryan v. Rogers, 21 Wyo. 311, 132 P. 95,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1913).

Whether accused was present in the demanding state at commission of crime may be inquired into on habeas corpus, where release is sought from arrest for extradition. Zulch v. Roach, 23 Wyo. 335, 151 P. 1101,

1915 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1915).

Time of crime. —

The time of the commission of the crime charged in the complaint or indictment is conclusive in habeas corpus proceedings instituted to prevent extradition, unless there is evidence to the contrary. Zulch v. Roach, 23 Wyo. 335, 151 P. 1101,

1915 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1915).

Custody of children. —

In habeas corpus proceeding involving right to custody of an infant, evidence was found sufficient to warrant court in denying petitioner right to custody of child on the ground that it would be to the best interest of the child, and save a separation of those remaining of the family, though it involved practical annulment of an appointment of petitioner as guardian of child by probate court of another state. Jones v. Bowman, 13 Wyo. 79, 77 P. 439,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1904).

Welfare of children. —

Where a father without a home, the mother being dead, proposes to take a four-year-old daughter from the care of her mother's parents to place her with his own relatives, the welfare of the child is to be considered. Harris v. Muir, 24 Wyo. 213, 157 P. 26,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1916).

Best interests of children. —

Section

3-2-105

is merely directory, and, in habeas corpus by a father to obtain the custody of his children living with the mother, the question is to be determined with reference to the best interest of the children. Tytler v. Tytler, 15 Wyo. 319, 89 P. 1,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1907).

Law of the forum in child custody. —

Question as to custody of children is to be determined by the law of the forum, irrespective of the law of the domicile. Tytler v. Tytler, 15 Wyo. 319, 89 P. 1,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1907).

Permanent custody. —

The mother being dead, a father having no home of his own was not entitled to take his four-year-old daughter from good care by her mother's parents to place her with his relatives; such an order not settling the permanent custody of the child. Harris v. Muir, 24 Wyo. 213, 157 P. 26,

1916 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1916).

In habeas corpus by a father to obtain custody of his minor children from the mother, evidence considered, and held that a judgment awarding custody to the father was an abuse of discretion; but that he should be permitted to visit them at all reasonable times. Tytler v. Tytler, 15 Wyo. 319, 89 P. 1,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1907).

Commitment for contempt

was at an end where prisoner was allowed to go free for almost two years without completing service. Posvar v. McPherson, 36 Wyo. 159, 253 P. 667,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1927).

Contempt record. —

The record in a contempt proceeding imports absolute verity, and cannot be questioned on habeas corpus to release the prisoner. Ex parte Bergman, 3 Wyo. 396, 26 P. 914,

1890 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1890).

Mere errors of law. —

Mere errors of law in imposing a sentence for contempt which do not affect jurisdiction of the trial court will not be reviewed on habeas corpus. Fisher v. McDaniel, 9 Wyo. 457, 64 P. 1056,

1901 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1901).

Plea withdrawals. —

Where defendant entered nolo contendere pleas to operating an unlawful clandestine laboratory operation and possession of a controlled substance, the state failed to uphold the provision in the plea agreement promising that defendant would not be charged with federal firearms crimes; because the sentence and judgment had already been imposed, the district court had no jurisdiction over defendant's motion to withdraw his guilty plea, and the proper avenue for presenting a challenge to defendant's conviction was by way of post-conviction relief under this section.
Brown v. State, 2008 WY 9, 175 P.3d 1158,

2008 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 2008).

Decision not appealable. —

A decision in a habeas corpus proceeding is not appealable, as the petitioner may avail himself of successive writs before other courts. Ex parte Brugneaux, 51 Wyo. 103, 63 P.2d 800,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1937).

Order discharging petitioner is not appealable. —

An order entered in a proceeding under this section discharging petitioner is not appealable. And this rule applies although petitioner was arrested pursuant to extradition proceedings. Geyer v. Tuck, 68 Wyo. 52, 229 P.2d 924,

1951 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1951).

There is no appeal from the disallowance of a writ of habeas corpus by a district court.

Foster v. Warden of Wyo. State Penitentiary, 489 P.2d 1166,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 258

(Wyo. 1971).

Normally, a person may petition for a writ of habeas corpus again and again to the same or other courts, each denial thereof being a nonappealable determination. State ex rel. Klopotek v. District Court, 621 P.2d 223,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo. 1980).

Appeal available in child-custody cases. —

An appeal is available from action taken in a habeas corpus proceeding in child-custody cases. State ex rel. Klopotek v. District Court, 621 P.2d 223,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo. 1980).

The proper remedy is an application for a writ of habeas corpus to the supreme court.

Foster v. Warden of Wyo. State Penitentiary, 489 P.2d 1166,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 258

(Wyo. 1971).

A writ of habeas corpus in all restraint cases, including child-custody cases, may be filed in the supreme court of Wyoming although the issuance of a similar writ may have been refused by a district court. State ex rel. Klopotek v. District Court, 621 P.2d 223,

1980 Wyo. LEXIS 325

(Wyo. 1980).

Appeal costs. —

Appeal costs were taxable against prevailing plaintiff in habeas corpus proceedings and district court costs against defendant sheriff. Posvar v. McPherson, 36 Wyo. 159, 253 P. 667,

1927 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1927).

Legislative intent regarding appeal. —

It is clear that legislature meant to keep common law in force when habeas corpus act was enacted and under common law no appeal lies from a judgment in habeas corpus proceedings, as prisoner has the right to go before other courts and other judges of state to secure his release. Ex parte Brugneaux, 51 Wyo. 103, 63 P.2d 800,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 6

(Wyo. 1937).

Applied

in

Henson v. Henson, 384 P.2d 721,

1963 Wyo. LEXIS 107

(Wyo. 1963); Cosco v. State, 503 P.2d 1403,

1972 Wyo. LEXIS 290

(Wyo. 1972); Weldon v. Wyoming Dep't of Cors., 963 F. Supp. 1098, 1997 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 6606 (D. Wyo. 1997).

Cited

in

Osborn v. Shillinger, 861 F.2d 612, 1988 U.S. App. LEXIS 14834 (10th Cir. 1988).

Law reviews. —

For article, “A Preliminary Review of Wyoming Revised Civil Commitment Procedures,” see XVII Land & Water L. Rev. 531 (1982).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

When is a person in custody of governmental authorities for purpose of exercise of state remedy of habeas corpus — modern cases, 26 ALR4th 455.

Validity of state statutes and administrative regulations regulating internet communications under commerce clause and First Amendment of federal constitution, 98 ALR5th 167.

Issuance by federal court, pursuant to 28 USC § 2241(c)(5), of writ of habeas corpus ad testificandum requiring presence of prisoner to testify at civil or criminal trial, 65 ALR Fed 321.

§ 1-27-102.
Petition to be verified; presentation.

The petition shall be
sworn to by the person confined or by someone in his behalf, and presented
to a court or officer authorized to allow the writ.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 61, § 2; R.S. 1887, § 1265; R.S. 1899, § 5465; C.S. 1910, § 6327; C.S. 1920, § 7623; R.S. 1931, § 51-102; C.S. 1945, § 3-6502; W.S. 1957, § 1-811; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-28-102

.

§ 1-27-103.
Courts and judges allowing writ; service in any part of state.

The writ of habeas corpus
may be allowed by the supreme or district court or by any judge of
those courts. It may be served in any part of the state.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 61, § 3; R.S. 1887, § 1266; R.S. 1899, § 5466; C.S. 1910, § 6328; C.S. 1920, § 7624; R.S. 1931, § 51-103; C.S. 1945, § 3-6503; W.S. 1957, § 1-812; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-28-103

.

Statutory regulation. —

The issuance of a writ of habeas corpus may be regulated by statute, providing the statutory regulation does not infringe upon constitutional right of the writ. Miskimins v. Shaver, 8 Wyo. 392, 58 P. 411,

1899 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1899).

Jurisdiction. —

A writ of habeas corpus, issued out of supreme court, will not invoke appellate or revisory jurisdiction of the court, but merely brings up body of the prisoner and cause of his commitment, and not the record of the judicial proceeding, if any, in which the commitment has occurred. Hovey v. Sheffner, 16 Wyo. 254, 93 P. 305,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1908).

Jurisdiction of judge. —

Under constitution a district judge's jurisdiction in habeas corpus is an unqualified one, and it is as broad in its scope as that of a court in such proceeding. Tytler v. Tytler, 15 Wyo. 319, 89 P. 1,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1907).

Petition treated as original proceeding in supreme court. —

Where petitioner filed what he termed a petition for a writ of habeas corpus and an appeal from the disallowance of a writ of habeas corpus by a district court, the petition was treated and considered as an original proceeding in the supreme court. Foster v. Warden of Wyo. State Penitentiary, 489 P.2d 1166,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 258

(Wyo. 1971).

Cited

in

State v. Keefe, 17 Wyo. 227, 98 P. 122,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 16

, 22 L.R.A. (n.s.) 896 (1908).

§ 1-27-104.
Petition to be made to nearest judge.

Petition for a writ shall
be made to the court or judge most convenient in point of distance
to the applicant. A more remote court or judge may refuse the writ
unless a sufficient reason is stated in the petition for not applying
to the more convenient supreme or district court or judge.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 61, § 5; R.S. 1887, § 1268; R.S. 1899, § 5467; C.S. 1910, § 6329; C.S. 1920, § 7625; R.S. 1931, § 51-104; C.S. 1945, § 3-6504; W.S. 1957, § 1-813; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-28-104

.

Applied

in

State v. District Court, 715 P.2d 191,

1986 Wyo. LEXIS 501

(Wyo. 1986).

Stated

in

State ex rel. Hopkinson v. District Court, 696 P.2d 54,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 455

(Wyo. 1985).

Cited

in

State v. Keefe, 17 Wyo. 227, 98 P. 122,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 16

, 22 L.R.A. (n.s.) 896 (1908).

§ 1-27-105.
Writ to be allowed if grounds sufficient; contents of writ.

The writ shall be allowed if the petition shows a sufficient ground for relief and is in accordance with the foregoing requirements.

The writ shall be directed to the person having custody of or who is alleged to be unlawfully restraining the petitioner, and shall command such person to produce the petitioner in person before the court or judge issuing the writ at the time and place specified in the writ. It shall further command such person to have with him the writ with his return thereon showing his doings in response thereto.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 61, § 7; R.S. 1887, § 1270; R.S. 1899, § 5469; C.S. 1910, § 6331; C.S. 1920, § 7627; R.S. 1931, § 51-106; C.S. 1945, § 3-6506; W.S. 1957, § 1-815; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-28-105

.

Petitioner must make case. —

Under this section writ will not issue in the first instance as of course, but petitioner must make out a prima facie case for its issuance. Ex parte Bergman, 3 Wyo. 396, 26 P. 914,

1890 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1890).

Denial of writ. —

The Wyoming supreme court did not violate petitioner's due process and equal protection rights by denying his habeas corpus petition on its own motion where petitioner did not state sufficient grounds for issuance of a writ. Weldon v. Wyoming Dep't of Corrections State Penitentiary Warden, 963 F. Supp. 1098, 1997 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 6606 (D. Wyo.), aff'd, 127 F.3d 1110, 1997 U.S. App. LEXIS 35011 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1997).

Effect of statute. —

Statute providing a proceeding whereby one who has been adjudged of unsound mind and who has been restored to sanity may have his restoration to capacity adjudged, and his guardianship, if not a minor, terminated, does not divest courts of jurisdiction to issue writ of habeas corpus in behalf of one illegally confined in an insane asylum, under their general constitutional power. Byers v. Solier, 16 Wyo. 232, 93 P. 59,

1907 Wyo. LEXIS 48

(Wyo. 1907).

Stated

in

Foster v. Warden of Wyo. State Penitentiary, 489 P.2d 1166,

1971 Wyo. LEXIS 258

(Wyo. 1971).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Construction and application of state statute providing compensation for wrongful conviction and incarceration, 34 ALR4th 648.

§ 1-27-106.
Issuance of writ.

When the writ is allowed
by a court, it is to be issued by the clerk, but when allowed by a
judge he must issue the writ himself, subscribing his name thereto
without any seal.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 61, § 8; R.S. 1887, § 1271; R.S. 1899, § 5470; C.S. 1910, § 6332; C.S. 1920, § 7628; R.S. 1931, § 51-107; C.S. 1945, § 3-6507; W.S. 1957, § 1-816; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-28-106

.

§ 1-27-107.
Reasons to be assigned for disallowance.

If the writ is disallowed,
the court or judge shall cause the reasons of the disallowance to
be appended to the petition and returned to the person applying for
the writ.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 61, § 9; R.S. 1887, § 1272; R.S. 1899, § 5471; C.S. 1910, § 6333; C.S. 1920, § 7629; R.S. 1931, § 51-108; C.S. 1945, § 3-6508; W.S. 1957, § 1-817; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-28-107

.

Petitioner must make case. —

Writ will not issue in the first instance as of course, as the petitioner must make out a prima facie case for the issuance of the writ. Ex parte Bergman, 3 Wyo. 396, 26 P. 914,

1890 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1890).

Quoted

in

Goldsmith v. Cheney, 468 P.2d 813,

1970 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 1970).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Abuse of writ as basis for dismissal of state prisoner's second or successive petition for federal habeas corpus, 60 ALR Fed 481.

§ 1-27-108.
Penalty for wrongful disallowance.

Any judge, acting individually
or as a member of a court, who wrongfully and willfully refuses the
allowance of the writ when properly applied for, shall forfeit to
the party aggrieved the sum of one thousand dollars ($1,000.00).

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 61, § 10; R.S. 1887, § 1273; R.S. 1899, § 5472; C.S. 1910, § 6334; C.S. 1920, § 7630; R.S. 1931, § 51-109; C.S. 1945, § 3-6509; W.S. 1957, § 1-818; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-28-108

.

§ 1-27-109.
Duty of court to issue writ without application in certain instances.

Whenever any court or
judge authorized to grant this writ has evidence from a judicial proceeding
before it that any person within the jurisdiction of the court or
judge is illegally imprisoned or restrained, the court or judge shall
issue the writ or cause it to be issued though no application has
been made.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 61, § 11; R.S. 1887, § 1274; R.S. 1899, § 5473; C.S. 1910, § 6335; C.S. 1920, § 7631; R.S. 1931, § 51-110; C.S. 1945, § 3-6510; W.S. 1957, § 1-819; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-28-109

.

Cited

in

State v. Keefe, 17 Wyo. 227, 98 P. 122,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 16

, 22 L.R.A. (n.s.) 896 (1908).

§ 1-27-110.
Service of writ.

The writ may be served
by the sheriff or by any other person appointed by the issuing court
or judge for that purpose. If served by any person other than the
sheriff, he possesses the same power and is liable to the same penalty
for a nonperformance of his duty as though he were the sheriff.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 61, § 12; R.S. 1887, § 1275; R.S. 1899, § 5474; C.S. 1910, § 6336; C.S. 1920, § 7632; R.S. 1931, § 51-111; C.S. 1945, § 3-6511; W.S. 1957, § 1-820; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-28-110

.

Cross references. —

As to penalty for nonperformance of duty, see §

1-24-104

.

§ 1-27-111.
Manner of service.

Service shall be made
by leaving the original writ with the person to whom it is directed
as defendant and preserving a copy on which to make the return of
service. If the defendant cannot be found, or if he does not have
the plaintiff in custody, service may be made upon any person having
the plaintiff in his custody in the same manner and with the same
effect as though he had been named defendant therein.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 61, §§ 13, 14; R.S. 1887, §§ 1276, 1277; R.S. 1899, §§ 5475, 5476; C.S. 1910, §§ 6337, 6338; C.S. 1920, §§ 7633, 7634; R.S. 1931, §§ 51-112, 51-113; C.S. 1945, §§ 3-6512, 3-6513; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-821, 1-822; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, §

1-28-111

.

§ 1-27-112.
Authorization to arrest defendant.

If the defendant conceals
himself or refuses admittance to the person attempting to serve the
writ, or if he attempts wrongfully to carry the plaintiff out of the
county or state after service of the writ, the person attempting to
serve the writ may arrest the defendant and bring him and the plaintiff
promptly before the judge or court before whom the writ is made returnable.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 61, § 15; R.S. 1887, § 1278; R.S. 1899, § 5477; C.S. 1910, § 6339; C.S. 1920, § 7635; R.S. 1931, § 51-114; C.S. 1945, § 3-6514; W.S. 1957, § 1-823; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-28-112.

§ 1-27-113.
Power of sheriff making arrest.

In order to make the
arrest, the sheriff or other person having the writ possesses the
same power as a sheriff for the arrest of a person charged with a
felony.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 61, § 16; R.S. 1887, § 1279; R.S. 1899, § 5478; C.S. 1910, § 6340; C.S. 1920, § 7636; R.S. 1931, § 51-115; C.S. 1945, § 3-6515; W.S. 1957, § 1-824; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-28-113.

Cross references. —

As to power of sheriff to make arrests, see §§

7-2-102

and

7-2-103

.

§ 1-27-114.
Plaintiff may be taken in custody by officer; power of officer.

If the plaintiff is found
and no one appears to have charge or custody of him, the person having
the writ may take him into custody and make return accordingly. To
get possession of the plaintiff’s person in such cases, he possesses
the same power as given by W.S.

1-27-113

for the arrest of the defendant.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 61, § 17; R.S. 1887, § 1280; R.S. 1899, § 5479; C.S. 1910, § 6341; C.S. 1920, § 7637; R.S. 1931, § 51-116; C.S. 1945, § 3-6516; W.S. 1957, § 1-825; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-28-114.

§ 1-27-115.
Order for summary production of plaintiff.

The court or judge to
whom the petition for the writ is made may order the sheriff or any
other person to bring the plaintiff promptly before the court or judge
if convinced that the plaintiff will suffer irreparable injury before
he can obtain relief by the proceedings authorized.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 61, § 18; R.S. 1887, § 1281; R.S. 1899, § 5480; C.S. 1910, § 6342; C.S. 1920, § 7638; R.S. 1931, § 51-117; C.S. 1945, § 3-6517; W.S. 1957, § 1-826; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-28-115.

§ 1-27-116.
Order for defendant's arrest for criminal offense.

When the evidence is
sufficient to justify the arrest of the defendant for a criminal offense
committed in connection with the illegal restraint of the petitioner,
the order shall also order the arrest of the defendant.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 61, § 19; R.S. 1887, § 1282; R.S. 1899, § 5481; C.S. 1910, § 6343; C.S. 1920, § 7639; R.S. 1931, § 51-118; C.S. 1945, § 3-6518; W.S. 1957, § 1-827; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-28-116.

§ 1-27-117.
Order for defendant's arrest for criminal offense; service of order
of arrest.

The officer or person
to whom the order is directed must execute it by bringing the defendant,
and the plaintiff if required, before the court or judge issuing it.
The defendant shall make return to the writ of habeas corpus in the
same manner as if the ordinary course had been pursued.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 61, § 20; R.S. 1887, § 1283; R.S. 1899, § 5482; C.S. 1910, § 6344; C.S. 1920, § 7640; R.S. 1931, § 51-119; C.S. 1945, § 3-6519; W.S. 1957, § 1-828; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-28-117.

§ 1-27-118.
Examination, commitment or discharge of defendant.

The defendant may be
examined, committed, bailed or discharged according to the nature
of the case.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 61, § 21; R.S. 1887, § 1284; R.S. 1899, § 5483; C.S. 1910, § 6345; C.S. 1920, § 7641; R.S. 1931, § 51-120; C.S. 1945, § 3-6520; W.S. 1957, § 1-829; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-28-118.

§ 1-27-119.
Errors in writ to be disregarded.

The writ of habeas corpus
shall not be disobeyed for any defect of form or misdescription of
the plaintiff or defendant if enough is stated to show the meaning
and intent of the writ.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 61, § 22; R.S. 1887, § 1285; R.S. 1899, § 5484; C.S. 1910, § 6346; C.S. 1920, § 7642; R.S. 1931, § 51-121; C.S. 1945, § 3-6521; W.S. 1957, § 1-830; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-28-119.

§ 1-27-120.
Identity of defendant presumed.

Any person served with
the writ is presumed to be the person to whom it is directed, although
it may be directed to him by a wrong name or description.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 61, § 23; R.S. 1887, § 1286; R.S. 1899, § 5485; C.S. 1910, § 6347; C.S. 1920, § 7643; R.S. 1931, § 51-122; C.S. 1945, § 3-6522; W.S. 1957, § 1-831; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-28-120.

Evidence of identity. —

Where plaintiff was arrested on a foreign indictment and in habeas corpus proceedings denied that he was the person for whom warrant was intended, burden was on demanding state to introduce some evidence identifying plaintiff as the person indicted. Ryan v. Rogers, 21 Wyo. 311, 132 P. 95,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1913).

Identity as fugitive from justice. —

One arrested as a fugitive from justice is entitled as of right on habeas corpus to show that he is not a fugitive from the justice of demanding state, and overcome the presumption to the contrary arising from the face of the extradition warrant. Ryan v. Rogers, 21 Wyo. 311, 132 P. 95,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1913).

Evidence of alibi insufficient. —

In habeas corpus to obtain plaintiff's discharge from arrest under extradition warrant, evidence of an alibi was not so clear and satisfactory as to require a determination that plaintiff was not a fugitive from justice of the demanding state. Ryan v. Rogers, 21 Wyo. 311, 132 P. 95,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 1913).

§ 1-27-121.
Contents of defendant's answer.

The defendant in his
answer shall state simply and unequivocally whether he then has or
at any time has had the plaintiff under his control and restraint,
and if so, the reason therefor. If he has transferred him to another
person, he shall state the fact, to whom and the time thereof, and
the reason and authority therefor. If he holds him by virtue of a
legal process or written authority, a copy thereof shall be annexed.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 61, §§ 29-31; R.S. 1887, §§ 1292-1294; R.S. 1899, §§ 5491-5493; C.S. 1910, §§ 6353-6355; C.S. 1920, §§ 7649-7650; R.S. 1931, §§ 51-128 to 51-130; C.S. 1945, §§ 3-6528 to 3-6530; W.S. 1957, §§ 1-837 to 1-839; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-28-121.

§ 1-27-122.
Petitioner may reply to answer; trial by court.

The petitioner may reply
to the defendant’s answer, and all issues joined thereon shall be
tried by the judge or court.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 61, § 32; R.S. 1887, § 1295; R.S. 1899, § 5494; C.S. 1910, § 6356; C.S. 1920, § 7652; R.S. 1931, § 51-131; C.S. 1945, § 3-6531; W.S. 1957, § 1-840; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-28-122.

§ 1-27-123.
Evidence before magistrate may be reviewed.

The reply may deny the
sufficiency of the testimony to justify the action of the committing
magistrate, on the trial of which issue all written testimony before
the magistrate may be given in evidence before the court or judge
in connection with any other testimony which may then be produced.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 61, § 33; R.S. 1887, § 1296; R.S. 1899, § 5495; C.S. 1910, § 6357; C.S. 1920, § 7653; R.S. 1931, § 51-132; C.S. 1945, § 3-6532; W.S. 1957, § 1-841; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-28-123.

§ 1-27-124.
Compelling attendance of witnesses; punishing for contempt.

The judge issuing the
writ of habeas corpus or the judge before whom it is tried has the
same power as a court to compel the attendance of witnesses or to
punish contempt of his authority.

History.

Laws 1884, ch. 47, § 2; R.S. 1887, § 1298; R.S. 1899, § 5497; C.S. 1910, § 6359; C.S. 1920, § 7655; R.S. 1931, § 51-134; C.S. 1945, § 3-6534; W.S. 1957, § 1-843; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-28-124.

§ 1-27-125.
Certain proceedings not reviewable.

Habeas corpus is not
permissible to question the correctness of the action of a grand jury
in finding a bill of indictment, or a petit jury in the trial of a
cause nor of a court or judge when acting within their jurisdiction
and in a lawful manner.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 61, § 34; R.S. 1887, § 1299; R.S. 1899, § 5498; C.S. 1910, § 6360; C.S. 1920, § 7656; R.S. 1931, § 51-135; C.S. 1945, § 3-6535; W.S. 1957, § 1-844; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-28-125.

“Manner.” —

The word “manner” had reference to the method of acting, and not to the degree of perfection or correctness in the results arrived at, unless judgment pronounced was absolutely void. Hovey v. Sheffner, 16 Wyo. 254, 93 P. 305,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1908).

Appellate review. —

In absence of express statute, decision in a habeas corpus case is not reviewable by an appellate court. Miskimins v. Shaver, 8 Wyo. 392, 58 P. 411,

1899 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1899).

Revocation of parole. —

A prisoner seeking federal habeas review of parole revocation did not fairly represent his claims to the Wyoming supreme court by giving that court an opportunity to rule on the merits when he filed his state habeas corpus petition. Hamill v. Ferguson, 937 F. Supp. 1517, 1996 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 17115 (D. Wyo. 1996).

Drawing jury. —

Under this section, a petitioner for a writ of habeas corpus could not thereunder question regularity of method adopted by the court in drawing and summoning the jury by which he was convicted. Younger v. Hehn, 12 Wyo. 289, 75 P. 443,

1904 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1904).

Reviewing errors of law. —

A writ of habeas corpus is not available to review errors of law not affecting jurisdiction of the court to make order under which petitioner is held. Hovey v. Sheffner, 16 Wyo. 254, 93 P. 305,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 24

(Wyo. 1908).

Scope of inquiry. —

Under this section, charge that a plea of guilty was not voluntary, but was extorted from defendants through fear and misrepresentation, is not open for consideration on habeas corpus. Hollibaugh v. Hehn, 13 Wyo. 269, 79 P. 1044,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1905).

Validity of judgment. —

Validity of a judgment sentencing defendant to imprisonment until his fine is paid cannot be questioned on habeas corpus proceedings on the ground that no time is fixed for the imprisonment. In re MacDonald, 4 Wyo. 150, 33 P. 18,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1893).

Applied

in

State ex rel. Hopkinson v. District Court, 696 P.2d 54,

1985 Wyo. LEXIS 455

(Wyo. 1985); Hennigan v. State, 746 P.2d 360,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 536

(Wyo. 1987); Hopkinson v. State, 798 P.2d 1186,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 171

(Wyo. 1990); Hopkinson v. State, 798 P.2d 1193,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 107

(Wyo. 1990).

Quoted

in

Phillips v. Ferguson, 182 F.3d 769, 1999 U.S. App. LEXIS 14908 (10th Cir. 1999).

Cited

in

Weldon v. Wyoming Dep't of Cors., 963 F. Supp. 1098, 1997 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 6606 (D. Wyo. 1997); Parkhurst v. Shillinger, 128 F.3d 1366,

1997 U.S. App. LEXIS 29095

(10th Cir. 1997); Saunders v. Hornecker, 2015 WY 34,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 39

(Mar. 5, 2015).

§ 1-27-126.
When petitioner to be discharged.

If no sufficient legal
cause of detention is shown, the petitioner must be discharged.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 61, § 35; R.S. 1887, § 1300; R.S. 1899, § 5499; C.S. 1910, § 6361; C.S. 1920, § 7657; R.S. 1931, § 51-136; C.S. 1945, § 3-6536; W.S. 1957, § 1-845; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-28-126.

Inquiry into contempt. —

Where one imprisoned for contempt sues out writ of habeas corpus, court before whom such writ is returnable may examine into the acts, constituting alleged contempt; and, if they do not in law constitute a contempt, prisoner should be discharged. Miskimins v. Shaver, 8 Wyo. 392, 58 P. 411,

1899 Wyo. LEXIS 18

(Wyo. 1899).

Jurisdictional defect. —

Where petitioner, under information charging him with grand larceny, pleaded guilty of petit larceny, and such plea was accepted, a judgment of conviction of grand larceny, because he had previously been convicted of petit larceny and sentenced to penitentiary, was void, and he should be discharged on habeas corpus, the defect being jurisdictional. Bandy v. Hehn, 10 Wyo. 167, 67 P. 979,

1902 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1902), overruled, Munoz v. Maschner, 590 P.2d 1352,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 375

(Wyo. 1979).

Failure to show venue. —

In habeas corpus, where evidence certified by committing magistrate fails to show venue, the commitment is fatally defective; and where the application is to the supreme court, and the expense of supplying such evidence therein would be burdensome to parties, prisoner will be discharged. Ex parte Brenner, 3 Wyo. 412, 26 P. 993,

1891 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1891).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Availability of postconviction relief under 28 USC § 2255 based on alleged governmental violation of the Interstate Agreement on Detainers Act (18 USC Appx), 58 ALR Fed 443.

§ 1-27-127.
Errors in commitment to be disregarded.

Although the commitment
of the petitioner was irregular, if the court or judge is satisfied
from the evidence that he ought to be held to bail or committed either
for the offense charged or any other, an order may be made accordingly.

History.

C.L. 1876, ch. 61, § 36; R.S. 1887, § 1301; R.S. 1899, § 5500; C.S. 1910, § 6362; C.S. 1920, § 7658; R.S. 1931, § 51-137; C.S. 1945, § 3-6537; W.S. 1957, § 1-846; Laws 1977, ch. 188, § 1; W.S. 1977, § 1-28-127.

Cross references. —

As to bail, see Rule 3.1, W.R. Cr. P.

Discharge. —

Though evidence showed that defendants were not in demanding state at time laid as that of commission of the fraud, they were not entitled to discharge on habeas corpus, having admitted their presence in the demanding state and participation in the business in which frauds were alleged. Zulch v. Roach, 23 Wyo. 335, 151 P. 1101,

1915 Wyo. LEXIS 35

(Wyo. 1915).

Regularity of judgment. —

In habeas corpus proceedings regularity of the judgment under which petitioners were imprisoned cannot be impeached for errors or defects not affecting jurisdiction of the court to render the judgment. Hollibaugh v. Hehn, 13 Wyo. 269, 79 P. 1044,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 10

(Wyo. 1905).